Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.110

Enhanced manufacturing skills programs—Grants to skill centers—Selection criteria—Data collection by education data center—Reports.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to skill centers to implement enhanced manufacturing skills programs. Grant funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase or improve program curriculum, purchase course equipment, and support professional development for program teachers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult and team with the community and technical colleges' center of excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing regarding the developing aerospace program of study and industry career needs as well as other community and technical college manufacturing programs. This information must assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in refining specific aspects to the criteria in subsection (2) of this section and leveraging advantages and opportunities for students in selected skill centers.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (2). This is a competitive grant process. Successful skill center applicants must:

(a) Demonstrate that enhanced manufacturing skills programs meet industry certification standards;

(b) Demonstrate engaged and committed skill center and school district leadership and faculty in support of the program;

(c) Demonstrate capacity to offer the enhanced manufacturing skills programs and maximize the use of grant resources addressing: Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology requirements, providing projected enrollment from area high schools and students from area community and technical colleges if space is available, planned hours and days each week the program is to be offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(d) Demonstrate linkages to programs at local community and technical colleges and private technical schools to provide a seamless pathway for students to continue their education and career preparation beyond high school;

(e) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the community and partner support for implementing an enhanced manufacturing skills program that includes one or more of the following: Apprenticeships, supplying materials, instruction support, internships, mentorships, and other program components;

(f) Provide the plan for program implementation that includes a beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and retaining students in the program; and

(g) Demonstrate capacity to continue the program in years succeeding the initial grant year.

(3) The education research center in the office of financial management must collect enhanced manufacturing skills programs student participation and completion data for grant recipient skill centers. The center must follow students to employment or further training and education in the two years following the students' completion of the program. Findings must be reported beginning in January 2014 and each January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, other appropriate state agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 2nd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 28A.700.100.